Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1033
Transfer of incentives; when; liability
for recapture.

(1)
The incentives allowed under the Nebraska Advantage Transformational Tourism
and Redevelopment Act may be transferred when a project covered by an agreement
is transferred in its entirety by sale or lease to another taxpayer or in
an acquisition of assets qualifying under section 381 of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended.

(2) The acquiring
taxpayer, as of the date of notification of the municipality of the completed
transfer, shall be entitled to any future incentives allowable under the act.

(3) The acquiring
taxpayer shall be liable for any recapture that becomes due after the date
of the transfer for the repayment of any incentives received either before
or after the transfer.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 33.